Hawaii statutes.
[§607-8.5] Assessment for bench warrant
issuance. The court, when issuing a bench warrant for any person who fails
to appear or who otherwise fails to comply with a court order, may assess that
person a sum not to exceed $50 for the cost of issuing the bench warrant. [L
1999, c 92, §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next